District of Columbia statutes.
36-126

Title to registered mark to be acquired only by written consent of registrant.

No title may be acquired to any mark, name, or device, or any milk bottle, can, crate, or other container registered in accordance with this subchapter except by the consent in writing of the person who registered the same.

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 811, ch. 737, § 6
1981 Ed., § 48-206.
1973 Ed., § 48-206.